Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.675

Public health advisory board.

(1) The public health advisory board is established within the department. The advisory board shall:

(a) Advise and provide feedback to the governmental public health system and provide formal public recommendations on public health;

(b) Monitor the performance of the governmental public health system;

(c) Develop goals and a direction for public health in Washington and provide recommendations to improve public health performance and to achieve the identified goals and direction;

(d) Advise and report to the secretary;

(e) Coordinate with the governor's office, department, state board of health, local health jurisdictions, and the secretary;

(f) Evaluate public health emergency response and provide recommendations for future response, including coordinating with relevant committees, task forces, and stakeholders to analyze the COVID-19 public health response; and

(g) Evaluate the use of foundational public health services funding by the governmental public health system.

(2) The public health advisory board shall consist of representatives from each of the following appointed by the governor:

(a) The governor's office;

(b) The director of the state board of health or the director's designee;

(c) The secretary of the department or the secretary's designee;

(d) The chair of the governor's interagency council on health disparities;

(e) Two representatives from the tribal government public health sector selected by the American Indian health commission;

(f) One member of the county legislative authority from a eastern Washington county selected by a statewide association representing counties;

(g) One member of the county legislative authority from a western Washington county selected by a statewide association representing counties;

(h) An organization representing businesses in a region of the state;

(i) A statewide association representing community and migrant health centers;

(j) A statewide association representing Washington cities;

(k) Four representatives from local health jurisdictions selected by a statewide association representing local public health officials, including one from a jurisdiction east of the Cascade mountains with a population between 200,000 and 600,000, one from a jurisdiction east of the Cascade mountains with a population under 200,000, one from a jurisdiction west of the Cascade mountains with a population between 200,000 and 600,000, and one from a jurisdiction west of the Cascade mountains with a population less than 200,000;

(l) A statewide association representing Washington hospitals;

(m) A statewide association representing Washington physicians;

(n) A statewide association representing Washington nurses;

(o) A statewide association representing Washington public health or public health professionals; and

(p) A consumer nonprofit organization representing marginalized populations.

(3) In addition to the members of the public health advisory board listed in subsection (2) of this section, there must be four nonvoting ex officio members from the legislature consisting of one legislator from each of the two largest caucuses in both the house of representatives and the senate.

(4) Staff support for the public health advisory board, including arranging meetings, must be provided by the department.

(5) Legislative members of the public health advisory board may be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(6) The public health advisory board is a class one group under chapter 43.03 RCW.

[ 2021 c 205 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—2021 c 205: "The legislature finds that everyone in Washington state, no matter what community they live in, should be able to rely on a public health system that is able to support a standard level of public health service. Like public safety, there is a foundational level of public health delivery that must exist everywhere for services to work. A strong public health system is only possible with intentional investments into our state's public health system. Services should be delivered efficiently, equitably, and effectively, in ways that make the best use of technology, science, expertise, and leveraged resources and in a manner that is responsive to local communities." [ 2021 c 205 s 1.]